New York, session 2025-2026, S8099.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law, rule, or regu- 2 lation to the contrary, the Department of Environmental Conservation 3 shall not implement or enforce Advanced Clean Cars II regulations which 4 would require manufacturers of passenger cars and light duty trucks to 5 sell an increasing percentage of zero-emission vehicles earlier than 6 January 1, 2028. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11964-01-5